Missouri, session 2026, SB884.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 336.010, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 336.010,
to read as follows:
336.010. 1. The "practice of optometry" is the
examination, diagnosis, [treatment, and preventative care]
prevention, and treatment, surgical or nonsurgical, of the
eye, adnexa, and vision. The practice includes, but is not
limited to:
(1) The examination of the eye, adnexa, and vision to
determine the accommodative and refractive states, visual
perception, conditions, and diseases;
(2) The diagnosis and treatment of conditions or
diseases of the eye, adnexa, and vision;
(3) The performance of diagnostic procedures and
ordering of laboratory and imaging tests for the diagnosis
of vision and conditions and diseases of the eye and adnexa;
(4) The prescription and administration of
pharmaceutical agents[, excluding injectable agents,] for
the purpose of examination, diagnosis, and treatment of
vision and conditions or diseases of the eye and adnexa;
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 884 2
(5) The removal of superficial foreign bodies from the
eye or adnexa;
(6) Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law to
the contrary, including section 334.010, the correction and
relief of ocular abnormalities by surgical procedures not
excluded under subsection 2 of this section;
(7) The employment of objective or subjective
mechanical means to determine the accommodative or
refractive states of the human eye;
[(7)] (8) The prescription or adaptation of lenses,
prisms, devices, or ocular exercises to correct defects or
abnormal conditions of the human eye or vision or to adjust
the human eye to special conditions;
[(8)] (9) The prescription and fitting of ophthalmic
or contact lenses and devices;
[(9)] (10) The prescription and administration of
vision therapy; and
[(10)] (11) The prescription and administration of low
vision care.
2. The board shall continue to review surgical
procedures not listed in this subsection but which shall be
excluded from the scope of the practice of optometry. The
following procedures are not within the scope of optometry
and an optometrist [may] shall not perform [surgery,
including the use of lasers for treatment of any disease or
condition or for the correction of refractive error] such
procedures, except for the preoperative and postoperative
care of these procedures:
(1) Retina laser procedures, laser-assisted in situ
keratomileusis (LASIK), and photorefractive keratectomy
(PRK);

SB 884 3
(2) Nonlaser surgery related to removal of the eye
from a living human being;
(3) Nonlaser surgery requiring full thickness incision
or excision of the cornea or sclera other than paracentesis
in an emergency situation requiring immediate reduction of
the pressure inside the eye;
(4) Penetrating keratoplasty (corneal transplant) or
lamellar keratoplasty;
(5) Nonlaser surgery requiring incision of the iris
and ciliary body, including iris diathermy or cryotherapy;
(6) Nonlaser surgery requiring incision of the
vitreous;
(7) Nonlaser surgery requiring incision of the retina;
(8) Nonlaser surgical extraction of the crystalline
lens;
(9) Nonlaser surgical intraocular implants;
(10) Incisional or excisional nonlaser surgery of the
extraocular muscles;
(11) Nonlaser surgery of the eyelid for eyelid
malignancies or for incisional cosmetic or mechanical repair
of blepharochalasis, ptosis, and tarsorrhaphy;
(12) Nonlaser surgery of the bony orbit, including
orbital implants;
(13) Incisional or excisional nonlaser surgery of the
lacrimal system other than lacrimal probing or related
procedures;
(14) Nonlaser surgery requiring full thickness
conjunctivoplasty with graft or flap;
(15) Any nonlaser surgical procedure that does not
provide for the correction and relief of ocular
abnormalities;

SB 884 4
(16) Laser or nonlaser injection into the posterior
chamber of the eye to treat any macular or retinal disease;
and
(17) The administration of general anesthesia.
3. As used in this chapter, except as the context may
otherwise require, the following terms mean:
(1) "Eye", the human eye;
(2) "Adnexa", all structures adjacent to the eye and
the conjunctiva, lids, lashes, and lacrimal system;
(3) "Board", the Missouri state board of optometry;
(4) "Diagnostic pharmaceutical agents", topically
applied pharmaceuticals used for the purpose of conducting
an examination of the eye, adnexa, and vision;
(5) "Low vision care", the examination, treatment, and
management of patients with visual impairments not treatable
by conventional eyewear or contact lenses and may include a
vision rehabilitation program to enhance remaining vision
skills;
(6) "Pharmaceutical agents", any diagnostic and
therapeutic drug or combination of drugs that assist the
100 diagnosis, prevention, treatment, or mitigation of abnormal
101 conditions or symptoms of the human eye, adnexa, and vision;
102 (7) "Therapeutic pharmaceutical agents", those
103 pharmaceuticals[, excluding injectable agents,] used for the
104 treatment of conditions or diseases of the eye, adnexa, and
105 vision;
106 (8) "Vision therapy", a treatment regiment to improve
107 a patient's diagnosed visual dysfunctions, prevent the
108 development of visual problems, or enhance visual
109 performance to meet the defined needs of the patient.
✓